dictionaries/sk_SK/src/Slovak.aff
SFX Y   0           ých        in is:feminine is:genitive is:plural
SFX Y   0           ých        in is:neuter is:genitive is:plural
SFX Y   0           ých        in is:masculine is:locative is:plural
SFX Y   0           ých        in is:feminine is:locative is:plural
SFX Y   0           ých        in is:neuter is:locative is:plural
SFX Y   0           mu         in is:masculine is:dative
SFX Y   0           mu         in is:neuter is:dative
SFX Y   0           ým         in is:masculine is:dative is:plural
SFX Y   0           ým         in is:feminine is:dative is:plural
SFX Y   0           ým         in is:neuter is:dative is:plural
SFX Y   0           u          in is:feminine is:accusative
SFX Y   0           om         in is:masculine is:locative
SFX Y   0           om         in is:neuter is:locative
SFX Y   0           ou         in is:feminine is:instrumental
SFX Y   0           ými        in is:masculine is:instrumental is:plural
SFX Y   0           ými        in is:feminine is:instrumental is:plural
SFX Y   0           ými        in is:neuter is:instrumental is:plural
SFX Y   0           a          ov is:feminine is:nominative
SFX Y   0           o          ov is:neuter is:nominative
SFX Y   0           i          ov is:masculine is:nominative is:plural
SFX Y   0           e          ov is:neuter is:nominative is:plural
SFX Y   0           ho         ov is:masculine is:genitive
SFX Y   0           ho         ov is:neuter is:genitive
SFX Y   0           ej         ov is:feminine is:genitive
SFX Y   0           ej         ov is:feminine is:accusative
SFX Y   0           ých        ov is:masculine is:genitive is:plural
SFX Y   0           ých        ov is:feminine is:genitive is:plural
SFX Y   0           ých        ov is:neuter is:genitive is:plural
SFX Y   0           ých        ov is:masculine is:accusative is:plural
SFX Y   0           ých        ov is:feminine is:accusative is:plural
SFX Y   0           ých        ov is:neuter is:accusative is:plural
SFX Y   0           mu         ov is:masculine is:dative
SFX Y   0           mu         ov is:neuter is:dative
SFX Y   0           ým         ov is:masculine is:dative is:plural
SFX Y   0           ým         ov is:feminine is:dative is:plural
SFX Y   0           ým         ov is:neuter is:dative is:plural
SFX Y   0           ým         ov is:masculine is:instrumental is:plural
SFX Y   0           ým         ov is:feminine is:instrumental is:plural
SFX Y   0           ým         ov is:neuter is:instrumental is:plural
SFX Y   0           u          ov is:feminine is:accusative
SFX Y   0           om         ov is:masculine is:locative
SFX Y   0           om         ov is:neuter is:locative
SFX Y   0           ou         ov is:feminine is:instrumental
SFX Y   0           ými        ov is:masculine is:instrumental is:plural
SFX Y   0           ými        ov is:feminine is:instrumental is:plural
SFX Y   0           ými        ov is:neuter is:instrumental is:plural
SFX Y   y           e          y is:neuter is:nominative
SFX Y   y           e          y is:neuter is:accusative
SFX Y   y           e          y is:masculine is:nominative
SFX Y   y           e          y is:feminine is:nominative
SFX Y   y           e          y is:masculine is:accusative
SFX Y   y           e          y is:feminine is:accusative
SFX Y   y           a          y is:feminine is:nominative
SFX Y   y           i          y is:masculine is:nominative
SFX Y   y           o          y po:adverb
SFX Y   y           eho        y is:masculine is:genitive
SFX Y   y           eho        y is:neuter is:genitive
SFX Y   y           eho        y is:masculine is:accusative
SFX Y   y           ej         y is:feminine is:genitive
SFX Y   y           ej         y is:feminine is:dative
SFX Y   y           ych        y is:masculine is:locative is:plural
SFX Y   y           ych        y is:feminine is:locative is:plural
SFX Y   y           ych        y is:neuter is:locative is:plural
SFX Y   y           emu        y is:masculine is:dative
SFX Y   y           emu        y is:neuter is:dative
SFX Y   y           ym         y is:masculine is:dative is:plural
SFX Y   y           ym         y is:feminine is:dative is:plural
SFX Y   y           ym         y is:neuter is:dative is:plural
SFX Y   y           u          y is:feminine is:accusative
SFX Y   y           om         y is:masculine is:locative
SFX Y   y           om         y is:neuter is:locative
SFX Y   y           ou         y is:feminine is:instrumental
SFX Y   y           ymi        y is:masculine is:instrumental is:plural
SFX Y   y           ymi        y is:feminine is:instrumental is:plural
SFX Y   y           ymi        y is:neuter is:instrumental is:plural
SFX Y   y           ejšie      [bklmnprtv]y is:comparative is:masculine is:nominative is:plural
SFX Y   y           ejšie      [bklmnprtv]y is:comparative is:feminine is:nominative is:plural
SFX Y   y           ejšie      [bklmnprtv]y is:comparative is:neuter is:nominative is:plural
SFX Y   y           ejšie      [bklmnprtv]y is:comparative is:masculine is:accusative is:plural
SFX Y   y           ejšie      [bklmnprtv]y is:comparative is:feminine is:accusative is:plural
SFX Y   y           ejšie      [bklmnprtv]y is:comparative is:neuter is:accusative is:plural
SFX Y   y           ejšia      [bklmnprtv]y is:comparative is:feminine is:nominative
SFX Y   y           ejší       [bklmnprtv]y is:comparative is:masculine is:nominative
SFX Y   y           ejšieho    [bklmnprtv]y is:comparative is:masculine is:genitive
SFX Y   y           ejšieho    [bklmnprtv]y is:comparative is:neuter is:genitive
SFX Y   y           ejšej      [bklmnprtv]y is:comparative is:feminine is:genitive
SFX Y   y           ejších     [bklmnprtv]y is:comparative is:masculine is:genitive
SFX Y   y           ejších     [bklmnprtv]y is:comparative is:feminine is:genitive
SFX Y   y           ejších     [bklmnprtv]y is:comparative is:neuter is:genitive
SFX Y   y           ejších     [bklmnprtv]y is:comparative is:masculine is:accusative
SFX Y   y           ejších     [bklmnprtv]y is:comparative is:feminine is:accusative
SFX Y   y           ejších     [bklmnprtv]y is:comparative is:neuter is:accusative
SFX Y   y           ejšiemu    [bklmnprtv]y is:comparative is:masculine is:dative
SFX Y   y           ejšiemu    [bklmnprtv]y is:comparative is:neuter is:dative
SFX Y   y           ejšej      [bklmnprtv]y is:comparative is:feminine is:dative
SFX Y   y           ejším      [bklmnprtv]y is:comparative is:masculine is:dative is:plural
SFX Y   y           ejším      [bklmnprtv]y is:comparative is:feminine is:dative is:plural
SFX Y   y           ejším      [bklmnprtv]y is:comparative is:neuter is:dative is:plural
SFX Y   y           ejšiu      [bklmnprtv]y is:comparative is:feminine is:accusative
SFX Y   y           ejších     [bklmnprtv]y is:comparative is:masculine is:accusative is:plural
SFX Y   y           ejšom      [bklmnprtv]y is:comparative is:masculine is:locative
SFX Y   y           ejšom      [bklmnprtv]y is:comparative is:neuter is:locative
SFX Y   y           ejším      [bklmnprtv]y is:comparative is:masculine is:instrumental
SFX Y   y           ejším      [bklmnprtv]y is:comparative is:neuter is:instrumental
SFX Y   y           ejšou      [bklmnprtv]y is:comparative is:feminine is:instrumental
SFX Y   y           ejšími     [bklmnprtv]y is:comparative is:masculine is:instrumental is:plural
SFX Y   y           ejšími     [bklmnprtv]y is:comparative is:feminine is:instrumental is:plural
SFX Y   y           ejšími     [bklmnprtv]y is:comparative is:neuter is:instrumental is:plural
SFX Y   ý           í          ý is:masculine is:nominative is:plural
SFX Y   ý           é          ý is:feminine is:nominative is:plural
SFX Y   ý           é          ý is:feminine is:accusative is:plural
SFX Y   ý           é          ý is:neuter is:nominative is:plural
SFX Y   ý           é          ý is:neuter is:accusative is:plural
